Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.556

Waiver of tuition and fees for students of foreign nations—Authorized—Limitations.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may waive all or a portion of the tuition , and services and activities fees for undergraduate or graduate students of foreign nations subject to the following limitations:

(1) No more than the equivalent of one hundred waivers may be awarded to undergraduate or graduate students of foreign nations at each of the two state universities;

(2) No more than the equivalent of twenty waivers may be awarded to undergraduate or graduate students of foreign nations at each of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College;

(3) Priority in the awarding of waivers shall be given to students on academic exchanges or academic special programs sponsored by recognized international educational organizations; and

(4) An undergraduate or graduate student of a foreign nation receiving a waiver under this section is not eligible for any other waiver.

The waiver programs under this section, to the greatest extent possible, shall promote reciprocal placements and waivers in foreign nations for Washington residents. The number of waivers awarded by each institution shall not exceed the number of that institution's own students enrolled in approved study programs abroad during the same period.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 21; 1992 c 231 s 19; 1986 c 232 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.